New York, session 2025-2026, A3242.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Article 23 of the tax law is REPEALED. 2 § 2. Within 60 days of the effective date of this act, the commission- 3 er of taxation and finance shall review and recommend to the governor, 4 the temporary president of the senate, and the speaker of the assembly 5 any other provisions of law which require amendments or repeal thereof. 6 § 3. This act shall take effect two hundred seventy days after it 7 shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 8 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 9 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 10 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00884-01-5